Utah statutes.
59-2-322.   Transmittal of statement to commission.

(1)  The county auditor shall, before June 8 of each year, prepare from the assessment book of that year a statement showing in separate columns:

(a)  the total value of all property;

(b)  the value of real estate, including patented mining claims, stated separately;

(c)  the value of the improvements;

(d)  the value of personal property exclusive of money; and

(e)  the number of acres of land and the number of patented mining claims, stated separately.

(2)  As soon as the statement is prepared the county auditor shall transmit the statement to the commission.

